Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Article 2. Regulation of Operations.

Sec. 31.05.090.
Permits to drill wells.

A person shall apply for and receive a permit from the commission before drilling

a well in search of oil or gas;

a well in support of the recovery or production of oil or gas;

an underground injection well for the purpose of gas storage; or

an underground injection well for which the state has acquired primary enforcement responsibility under AS

31.05.030(h)

.

A person must submit a separate permit application for each well. The permit application must be in the form required by the commission and include all information required by the commission.

After receiving an application under (b) of this section, the commission shall promptly approve or deny the application for a permit to drill.

In making a determination under (c) of this section, the commission shall consider whether the

proposed well is contrary to law, a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission; or

applicant is in violation of a provision of this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order, stipulation, or term of a permit issued by the commission and the magnitude of such violation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 40 SLA 1955; am § 1 ch 120 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 54 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For drilling, see 20 AAC 25, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective July 13, 2007, repealed and reenacted this section.

Sec. 31.05.093.
Regulated well regulatory cost charge.

Every person that on the first day of a state fiscal year is the operator of a well for which a permit to drill has been issued under AS

31.05.090

and that has not, before that day, been plugged and abandoned and reported as abandoned in accordance with regulations of the commission shall pay to the commission an annual regulatory cost charge for that fiscal year. A regulatory cost charge may not be collected from a person unless the operation for which the person is responsible is within the jurisdiction of the commission.

The commission shall annually determine regulatory cost charges under this section. The regulatory cost charge to be paid by a person for a state fiscal year must be based on the total volume during the most recently concluded calendar year for the wells described in (a) of this section of which the person was the operator on the first day of the fiscal year as a percentage of the total volume during the same calendar year for all wells described in (a) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, “total volume” means the sum of the volume of all oil and gas produced from a well and all oil, gas, water, and other fluids, including waste slurry, injected into the well. For purposes of determining volume under this subsection, 6,000 cubic feet of gas has a volume that is the equivalent of one barrel of oil.

The commission shall determine the regulatory cost charges levied under this section so that the total amount to be collected approximately equals the appropriations made for the operating costs of the commission under this chapter for the fiscal year.

The commission shall administer the collection of the regulatory cost charges imposed under this section. The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of the appropriations made for the operating costs of the commission under this chapter that lapses into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate to the commission for its operating costs under this chapter for the next fiscal year an amount that is at least equal to the lapsed amount. If the legislature makes an appropriation to the commission under this subsection that is at least equal to the lapsed amount, the commission shall reduce the total regulatory cost charge collected for that fiscal year by a comparable amount.

The commission may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this section, including regulations for investigation of the accuracy of reported information and for collecting required payments.

History.

(§ 2 ch 34 SLA 1999; am § 13 ch 54 SLA 2007)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2007 amendment, effective July 13, 2007, deleted “less the estimated total of the fees to be collected under AS

31.05.090

” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (c), and deleted the second sentence of the subsection, relating to adjustment of the regulatory cost charges under certain circumstances.

Sec. 31.05.095.
Waste prohibited.

The waste of oil and gas in the state is prohibited.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

31.05.020

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Administrative Code. —

For production practices, see 20 AAC 25, art. 3.

For reports, see 20 AAC 25, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

58 C.J.S., Mines and Minerals, §§ 404, 455.

Sec. 31.05.100.
Establishment of drilling units for pools.

For the prevention of waste, to protect and enforce the correlative rights of lessees in a pool, and to avoid the augmenting and accumulation of risks arising from the drilling of an excessive number of wells, or the reduced recovery which might result from too small a number of wells, the commission shall, after a hearing, establish a drilling unit or units for each pool. The establishment of a unit for gas shall be limited to the production of gas.

Each well permitted to be drilled on a drilling unit shall be drilled under the rules and regulations and in accordance with the spacing pattern as the commission prescribes for the pool in which the well is located. Exceptions to the rules and spacing pattern may be granted where it is shown, after notice and hearing, that the unit is partly outside the pool, or for some other reason a well so located on the unit would be nonproductive, or topographical conditions are such as to make the drilling at such a location unduly burdensome. If an exception is granted, the commission shall take such action as will offset any advantage which the person securing the exception may have over other producers by reason of the drilling of the well as an exception, and so that drainage from developed units to the tract with respect to which the exception is granted will be prevented or minimized, and the producer of the well drilled as an exception will be allowed to produce no more than a just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool.

When two or more separately owned tracts of land are embraced within an established drilling unit, persons owning the drilling rights in it and the right to share in the production from it may agree to pool their interests and develop their lands as a drilling unit. If the persons do not agree to pool their interests, the commission may enter an order pooling and integrating their interests for the development of their lands as a drilling unit for the prevention of waste, for the protection of correlative rights, or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells. Orders effectuating such pooling shall be made after notice and hearing, and shall be upon terms and conditions which will afford to the owner of each tract the opportunity to recover or receive the owner’s just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool without unnecessary expense. Operations incident to the drilling of a well upon a portion of a unit covered by a pooling order shall be considered for all purposes to be the conduct of the operation upon each separately owned tract in the unit by the several lessees of it. The portion of the production allocated to the lessee of each tract included in a drilling unit formed by a pooling order shall, when produced, be considered as if it had been produced from the tract by a well drilled on it. If pooling is effectuated, the cost of development and operation of the pooled unit chargeable by the operator to the other interested lessee is limited to the actual and reasonable expenditures for this purpose, including a reasonable charge for supervision. As to lessees who refuse to agree upon pooling, the order shall provide for reimbursement for costs chargeable to each lessee out of, and only out of, production from the unit belonging to such lessee. In the event of a dispute relative to the costs, the commission shall determine the proper costs upon notice to all interested parties and hearing. Appeals may be taken from the determination as from any other order of the commission. If a lessee drills and operates, or pays the expense of drilling and operating the well for the benefit of others, then in addition to any other right conferred by the pooling order, the lessee drilling or operating has a lien on the share of production from the unit accruing to the interest of each of the other lessees for the payment of the proportionate share of such expenses. All the oil and gas subject to the lien, or so much of the oil and gas subject to the lien as is necessary shall be marketed and sold by the creditor, and the proceeds applied in payment of the expenses secured by the lien, with the balance, if any, payable to the debtor.

The commission shall, in all instances where a unit has been formed out of lands or areas of more than one ownership, require the operator, upon request of a lessee, but subject to the right of the operator to market production and collect the proceeds with respect to a lessee in default, as provided in (c) of this section, to deliver to the lessee or assigns the lessee’s proportionate share of the production from the well common to the drilling unit. The lessee receiving a share shall provide at the lessee’s own expense proper receptacles for the receipt and storage of it.

If persons owning the drilling or other rights in separate tracts embraced within a drilling unit fail to agree upon the pooling of the tracts and the drilling of the well on the unit, and if the commission is without authority to require pooling as provided by this section, then, subject to all other applicable provisions of this chapter, the lessee of each tract embraced within the drilling unit may drill on the lessee’s tract, but the allowable production from the tract shall be the proportion of the allowable production for the full drilling unit as the area of the separately owned tract bears to the full drilling unit.

History.

(§ 6 ch 40 SLA 1955)

Cross references. —

For oil and gas leasing, see AS

38.05.180

.

Administrative Code. —

For drilling, see 20 AAC 25, art. 1.

Sec. 31.05.110.
Unitization and unitized operation of pools and integration of interests by agreement.

To prevent, or to assist in preventing waste, to insure a greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas, and to protect the correlative rights of persons owning interests in the tracts of land affected, these persons may validly integrate their interests to provide for the unitized management, development, and operation of such tracts of land as a unit. Where, however, they have not agreed to integrate their interests, the commission, upon proper petition, after notice and hearing, has jurisdiction, power and authority, and it is its duty to make and enforce orders and do the things necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this section.

If upon the filing of a petition by or with the commission and after notice and hearing, all in the form and manner and in accordance with the procedure and requirements provided in this section, the commission finds that (1) the unitized management, operation and further development of a pool or portion of a pool is reasonably necessary in order to effectively carry on pressure control, pressure-maintenance or repressuring operations, cycling operations, water flooding operations, or any combination of these, or any other form of joint effort calculated to substantially increase the ultimate recovery of oil and gas from the pool; (2) one or more of the unitized methods of operation as applied to the pool or portion of it is feasible, and will prevent waste and will with reasonable probability result in the increased recovery of substantially more oil and gas from the pool than would otherwise be recovered; (3) the estimated additional cost, if any, of conducting such operations will not exceed the value of the additional oil and gas so recovered; and (4) the unitization and adoption of one or more of the unitized methods of operation is for the common good, it shall make a finding to that effect and make an order creating the unit and providing for the unitization and unitized operation of the pool or portion of it described in the order, upon the terms and conditions, as may be shown by the evidence to be fair, reasonable, equitable, and which are necessary or proper to protect, safeguard and adjust the respective rights and obligations of the several persons affected, including royalty owner, owners of overriding royalties, oil and gas payments, carried interests, mortgages, lien claimants and others, as well as the lessees. The petition shall set out a description of the proposed unit area with a map or plat of it attached, shall allege the existence of the facts required to be found by the commission as provided in this subsection and shall have attached to it a recommended plan of unitization applicable to the proposed unit area and which the petitioner considers to be fair, reasonable and equitable.

The order of the commission shall define the boundary of the area to be included within the unit area and prescribe with reasonable detail the plan of unitization applicable to it. Each unit and unit area may be limited to all or a portion of a single pool. Only so much of a pool or pools as has been defined and determined to be productive on the basis of information available to the commission may be so included within the unit area. A unit may be created to embrace less than the whole of a pool only where it is shown by the evidence that the area to be so included within the unit area is of a size and shape as may be reasonably required for the successful and efficient conduct of the unitized method of operation for which the unit is created, and that the conduct of it will have no material adverse effect upon the remainder of the pool. The plan of unitization for each unit and unit area shall be one suited to the needs and requirements of the particular unit dependent upon the facts and conditions found to exist with respect to it. In addition to other terms, provisions, conditions and requirements found by the commission to be reasonably necessary or proper to carry out the purpose of this chapter, and subject to the further requirements of this section, each plan of unitization shall contain fair, reasonable and equitable provisions for

the efficient unitized management or control of the further development and operation of the unit area for the recovery of oil and gas from the pool affected; under such a plan the actual operations within the unit area may be carried on in whole or in part by the unit itself, or by one or more of the lessees within the unit area as the unit operator subject to the supervision and direction of the unit, dependent upon what is most beneficial or expedient; the designation of the unit operator shall be by vote of the lessees in the unit in a manner provided in the plan of unitization and not by the commission;

the division of interest or formula for the apportionment and allocation of the unit production, among and to the several separately owned tracts within the unit area such as will reasonably permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such separately owned tracts to produce and receive, instead thereof, their fair, equitable and reasonable share of the unit production or other benefits of it; a separately owned tract’s fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production shall be measured by the value of each such tract for oil and gas purposes and its contributing value to the unit in relation to like values of other tracts in the unit, taking into account acreage, the quantity of oil and gas recoverable from it, location on the structure, its probable productivity of oil and gas in the absence of unit operations, the burden of operations to which the tract will or is likely to be subjected, or so many of these factors, or such other pertinent engineering, geological or operating factors as may be reasonably susceptible of determination; “unit production” as that term is used in this chapter means all oil and gas produced from a unit area from the effective date of the order of the commission creating the unit regardless of the well or tract within the unit area from which the same is produced;

the manner in which the unit and the further development and operation of the unit area shall or may be financed and the basis, terms and conditions on which the cost and expense of it shall be apportioned among and assessed against the tracts and interests made chargeable with it, including a detailed accounting procedure governing all charges and credits incident to such operations; upon terms and conditions as to time and rate of interest as may be fair to all concerned, reasonable provision shall be made in the plan of unitization for carrying or otherwise financing lessees who are unable to promptly meet their financial obligations in connection with the unit;

the procedure and basis upon which wells, equipment, and other properties of the several lessees within the unit area are to be taken over and used for unit operations, including the method of arriving at the compensation for it, or of otherwise proportionately equalizing or adjusting the investment of the several lessees in the project as of the effective date of unit operation;

the creation of an operating committee to have general overall management and control of the unit and the conduct of its business and affairs and the operations carried on by it, together with the creation or designation of other subcommittees, boards or officers to function under the authority of the operating committee as may be necessary, proper or convenient in the efficient management of the unit, defining the powers and duties of all the committees, boards and officers, and prescribing their tenure and time and method for their selection;

the time when the plan of unitization becomes effective;

the time when and the conditions under which and the method by which the unit shall or may be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

[Repealed, § 17 ch 160 SLA 1978.]

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, all proceedings held under this chapter, including the filing of petitions, the giving of notices, the conduct of hearings and other action taken by the commission shall be in the form and manner and in accordance with the procedure provided in AS

31.05.040

—

31.05.060

. Additional notice shall be given as the commission requires.

From the effective date of an order of the commission creating a unit and prescribing the plan of unitization applicable to it, the operation of a well producing from the pool or portion of it within the unit area defined in the order by persons other than the unit or persons acting under its authority or except in the manner and to the extent provided in the plan of unitization is unlawful and is prohibited.

The obligation or liability of the lessees or other owners of the oil and gas rights in the several separately owned tracts for the payment of unit expense shall at all times be several and not joint or collective and in no event shall a lessee or other owner of the oil and gas rights in the separately owned tract be chargeable with, obligated or liable, directly or indirectly, for more than the amount apportioned, assessed or otherwise charged to that lessee’s or owner’s interest in the separately owned tract under the plan of unitization and then only to the extent of the lien provided for in this chapter.

Subject to such reasonable limitations as may be set out in the plan of unitization, the unit has a first and prior lien upon the leasehold estate and all other oil and gas rights (exclusive of a landowners’ royalty interest) in and to each separately owned tract, the interest of the owners in and to the unit production and all equipment in the possession of the unit, to secure the payment of the amount of the unit expense charged to and assessed against such separately owned tract. The interest of the lessee or other persons who by lease, contract, or otherwise are obligated or responsible for the cost and expense of developing and operating a separately owned tract for oil and gas in the absence of unitization shall, however, be primarily responsible for and charged with any assessment for unit expense made against the tract and resort may be had to overriding royalties, oil and gas payments, or other interests, except royalty interests, which otherwise are not chargeable with these costs, only in the event the owner of interest primarily responsible fails to pay the assessment of the production to the credit thereof, or production is insufficient for that purpose. If the owner of any royalty interest, overriding royalty, oil or gas payment, or any other interest which under the plan of unitization is not primarily responsible for it pays in whole or in part the amount of an assessment for unit expense for the purpose of protecting such interest, or the amount of the assessment in whole or in part is deducted from the unit production to the credit of such interest, the owner of it is to the extent of the payment or deduction subrogated to all the rights of the unit with respect to the interest or interests primarily responsible for the assessment. The landowners’ royalty share of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract shall be regarded as royalty to be distributed to and among, or the proceeds of it paid to, the landowners, free and clear of all unit expense and free of any lien for it.

Property rights, leases, contracts, and all other rights and obligations shall be regarded as amended and modified to the extent necessary to conform to the provisions and requirements of this chapter, and to any valid and applicable plan of unitization or order of the commission made and adopted under this chapter, but otherwise remain in effect.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require a transfer to or vesting in the unit of title to the separately owned tracts or leases on them within the unit area, other than the right to use and operate them to the extent set out in the plan of unitization; nor shall the unit be regarded as owning the unit production. The unit production and the proceeds from the sale of it shall be owned by the several persons to whom it is allocated under the plan of unitization. All property, whether real or personal, which the unit may in any way acquire, hold, or possess, may not be acquired, held, or possessed by the unit for its own account but shall be acquired, held, and possessed by the unit for the account and as agent of the several lessees and shall be the property of the lessees as their interests appear under the plan of unitization, subject, however, to the right of the unit to the possession, management, use, or disposal of the same in the proper conduct of its affairs, and subject to any lien the unit may have on it to secure the payment of unit expense. Neither the unit production or proceeds of the sale of it, nor the other receipts shall be treated, regarded, or taxed as income or profits of the unit; but instead, all such receipts shall be the income of the several persons to whom or to whose credit the same are payable under the plan of unitization. To the extent the unit may receive or disburse the receipts it shall only do so as a common administrative agent of the persons to whom the receipts are payable.

The amount of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract within the unit, and only that amount, regardless of the well or wells in the unit area from which it may be produced and regardless of whether it is more or less than the amount of the production from the well or wells, if any, on any such separately owned tract, shall for all intents, uses and purposes be regarded and considered as production from the separately owned tract, and, except as may be otherwise authorized in this chapter, or in the plan of unitization approved by the commission, shall be distributed among or the proceeds of it paid to the persons entitled to share in the production from the separately owned tract in the same manner, in the same proportions, and upon the same condition that they would have participated and shared in the production or proceeds of it from such separately owned tract had not the unit been organized, and with the same legal effect. If adequate provisions are made for the receipt of it, the share of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract shall be delivered in kind to the persons entitled to it by virtue of ownership of oil and gas rights in it or by purchase from the owners subject to the rights of the unit to withhold and sell the same in payment of unit expense under the plan of unitization, and subject further to the call of the unit on such portions of the gas for operating purposes as may be provided in the plan of unitization.

An agreement or plan for the development and operation of a field or pool of oil or gas as a unit, if approved by the commission for the purpose of conserving oil or gas, does not violate a statute of the state prohibiting monopolies or acts, arrangements, agreements, contracts, combinations, or conspiracies in restraint of trade or commerce.

Operations carried on under and in accordance with the plan of unitization shall be regarded and considered as a fulfillment of a compliance with all of the provisions, covenants and conditions, express or implied, of the several oil and gas leases upon lands included within the unit area, or other contracts pertaining to the development of it insofar as the leases or other contracts may relate to the pool or portion of it included in the unit area. Wells drilled or operated on any part of the unit area no matter where located shall for all purposes be regarded as wells drilled on each separately owned tract within the unit area.

Nothing in this section or in any plan of unitization shall be construed as increasing or decreasing the implied covenants of a lease in respect to a common source of supply or lands not included within the unit area of a unit.

The unit area of a unit may be enlarged to include adjoining portions of the same pool, including the unit area of another unit, and a new unit created for the unitized management, operation and further development of the enlarged unit area, or the plan of unitization may be otherwise amended, or the unit area contracted, all in the same manner, upon the same conditions and subject to the same limitations as provided with respect to the creation of a unit in the first instance.

An aliquot of unit production may be underlifted or overlifted from a unit established under this chapter or AS

38.05.180(p)

only when it does not create waste, except the commissioner may permit underlifting or overlifting for temporary periods for the purpose of accommodating extraordinary disruptions to an interest owner’s production disposal system. Underlifted oil may be recovered by an interest owner at a daily rate not to exceed 10 percent of the owner’s working or royalty interest share of daily production at the time of underlift recovery. This subsection applies to all units created after June 30, 1978.

This section applies to all involuntary units formed in the state. Subsections (a) and (g) — (p) of this section apply to all voluntary units formed in the state and to a voluntary cooperative or unit plan of development or operation entered into in accordance with AS

38.05.180(p)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 40 SLA 1955; am §§ 8 — 13, 17 ch 160 SLA 1978; am § 33 ch 94 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For provisions regarding oil and gas leasing, see AS

38.05.180

.

Legislative history reports. —

For conference committee letter of intent relating to the 1978 repeal of subsection (d) (§ 17, ch. 160, SLA 1978 — HB 815), see 1978 House Journal, p. 1720.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Natural Resources has discretion under AS 38.05 and 11 AAC 83 to determine whether to commit an oil and gas lease to a unit if less than all the co-lessees ratify the unit agreement.
July 11, 1984, Op. Att’y Gen.

The commission’s compulsory unitization powers do not extend to oil and gas interests that are already subject to a unit plan entered into and approved by the Department of Natural Resources under AS

38.05.180(p)

. 1996 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Sec. 31.05.120.
Use of gas from well to manufacture carbon products without permit is prima facie waste.

The use of gas from a well producing gas only, or from a well which is primarily a gas well for the manufacture of carbon black or similar products predominantly carbon is declared to constitute waste prima facie, and the gas well may not be used for this purpose unless it is clearly shown at a public hearing held by the commission, on application of the person desiring to use the gas, that waste would not take place by the use of the gas for the purpose applied for, and that gas which would otherwise be lost is now available for such purpose, and that the gas to be used cannot be used for a more beneficial purpose, such as for light or fuel purposes, except at prohibitive cost, and that it would be in the public interest to grant the permit.
If the commission finds that the applicant has clearly shown a right to use the gas for the purpose applied for, it shall issue a permit upon terms and conditions it finds necessary in order to permit the use of the gas and at the same time require compliance with the intent of this section.

History.

(§ 8 ch 40 SLA 1955)